Maryland, session 2026, HB0283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
19–118.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0283*

HOUSE BILL 283
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CLAIM MADE UNDER A RESIDENTIAL
OR COMMERCIAL PROPERTY INSURANCE POLICY THAT:
(1) PROVIDES FOR THE ADJUSTMENT AND SETTLEMENT OF A
FIRST–PARTY CLAIM THAT REQUIRES THE REPAIRING, REBUILDING, OR REPLACING
OF DAMAGED OR DESTROYED PROPERTY BASED ON THE ACTUAL CASH VALUE OF
THE PROPERTY; AND
(2) IS ISSUED OR RENEWED ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026.
(B) THE MEASURE OF THE ACTUAL CASH VALUE RECOVERY IN SETTLEMENT
OF A CLAIM SHALL BE THE LESSER OF:
(1) THE AMOUNT IT WOULD COST THE INSURED TO REPAIR, REBUILD,
OR REPLACE THE DAMAGED OR DESTROYED PROPERTY LESS A REASONABLE
DEDUCTION FOR PHYSICAL DEPRECIATION BASED ON THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF THE COVERED LOSS; OR
(2) THE POLICY LIMIT.
(C) (1) THE EXPENSE OF LABOR NECESSARY TO REPAIR, REBUILD, OR
REPLACE THE DAMAGED OR DESTROYED PROPERTY:
(I) IS NOT A COMPONENT OF PHYSICAL DEPRECIATION; AND
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, MAY NOT BE TREATED BY THE INSURER AS HAVING DEPRECIATED IN
VALUE.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF APPLYING THE PROHIBITION ESTABLISHED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE EXPENSE OF LABOR
NECESSARY TO REPAIR, REBUILD, OR REPLACE THE DAMAGED OR DESTROYED
PROPERTY SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE LABOR RATE;
(II) ANY OVERHEAD OR PROFIT FEE CHARGED BY THE
PROVIDER OF THE LABOR SERVICES;
(III) ANY SALES TAX ON THE LABOR SERVICES; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER FEE OR TAX THAT MUST BE PAID TO OBTAIN THE
LABOR SERVICES.

HOUSE BILL 283 3
(3) THE PROHIBITION ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE LABOR COSTS THAT ARE INTRINSICALLY
INCLUDED IN THE COST OF MANUFACTURED MATERIALS OR GOODS.
19–217.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN INSURER THAT ISSUES OR
DELIVERS A HOMEOWNER’S INSURANCE OR RENTER’S INSURANCE POLICY IN THE
STATE.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AT LEAST
45 DAYS BEFORE EACH RENEWAL OF A POLICY OF HOMEOWNER’S INSURANCE OR
RENTER’S INSURANCE, THE INSURER SHALL PROVIDE TO THE INSURED A WRITTEN
NOTICE THAT IDENTIFIES:
(1) ANY DIFFERENCE BETWEEN COVERAGE LIMITS UNDER THE
EXPIRING POLICY AND COVERAGE LIMITS UNDER THE RENEWAL POLICY;
(2) ANY RISK THAT IS COVERED UNDER THE EXPIRING POLICY, BUT IS
NOT COVERED UNDER THE RENEWAL POLICY;
(3) THE EXTENT TO WHICH COVERAGE OF ANY RISK IS REDUCED OR
LIMITED UNDER THE RENEWAL POLICY, AS COMPARED TO THE EXPIRING POLICY;
AND
(4) ANY DIFFERENCE BETWEEN DEDUCTIBLES SPECIFIED UNDER THE
EXPIRING POLICY AND DEDUCTIBLES SPECIFIED UNDER THE RENEWAL POLICY.
(C) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL BE WRITTEN IN CLEAR AND SPECIFIC LANGUAGE;
(2) MAY NOT BE PROVIDED IN THE ANNUAL STATEMENT REQUIRED
UNDER § 19–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) MAY BE DELIVERED BY ELECTRONIC MEANS IF THE INSURER
COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 27–601.2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) AN INSURER IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE NOTICE UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IF ALL COVERAGES AND DEDUCTIBLES UNDER
THE EXPIRING POLICY AND THE RENEWAL POLICY ARE IDENTICAL.
27–303.

HOUSE BILL 283
It is an unfair claim settlement practice and a violation of this subtitle for an insurer,
nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance organization to:
(9) fail to act in good faith, as defined under § 27–1001 of this title, in
settling a first–party claim under a policy of property and casualty insurance; [or]
(10) fail to comply with the provisions of § 16–118 of this article; OR
(11) FAIL TO COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF § 19–118 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
27–304.
It is an unfair claim settlement practice and a violation of this subtitle for an insurer,
nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance organization, when committed with
the frequency to indicate a general business practice, to:
(17) fail to comply with the provisions of Title 15, Subtitle 10A of this article;
[or]
(18) fail to act in good faith, as defined under § 27–1001 of this title, in
settling a first–party claim under a policy of property and casualty insurance; OR
(19) FAIL TO COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF § 19–118 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act applies to all policies
and contracts issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or after October 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.